Vermont statutes. Title 11A Vermont Business Corporations
Subchapter 2. Procedure for Exercise of Dissenters’ Rights

§ 13.20.
Notice of dissenters’ rights.

If proposed corporate action creating dissenters’ rights under section 13.02 of this title is submitted to a vote at a shareholders’ meeting, the meeting notice must state that shareholders are or may be entitled to assert dissenters’ rights under this chapter and be accompanied by a copy of this chapter.

If corporate action creating dissenters’ rights under section 13.02 of this title is taken without a vote of shareholders, the corporation shall notify in writing all shareholders entitled to assert dissenters’ rights that the action was taken and send them the dissenters’ notice described in section 13.22 of this title.

HISTORY:

Added

1993, No. 85

, § 2, eff. Jan. 1, 1994.

§ 13.21.
Notice of intent to demand payment.

If proposed corporate action creating dissenters’ rights under section 13.02 of this title is submitted to a vote at a shareholders’ meeting, a shareholder who wishes to assert dissenters’ rights:

must deliver to the corporation before the vote is taken written notice of his or her intent to demand payment for his or her shares if the proposed action is effectuated; and

must not vote his or her shares in favor of the proposed action.

A shareholder who does not satisfy the requirements of subsection (a) of this section is not entitled to payment for his or her shares under this chapter.

HISTORY:

Added

1993, No. 85

, § 2, eff. Jan. 1, 1994.

§ 13.22.
Dissenters’ notice.

If proposed corporate action creating dissenters’ rights under section 13.02 of this title is authorized at a shareholders’ meeting, the corporation shall deliver a written dissenters’ notice to all shareholders who satisfied the requirements of section 13.21 of this title.

The dissenters’ notice must be sent no later than 10 days after the corporate action was taken, and must:

state where the payment demand must be sent and where and when certificates for certificated shares must be deposited;

inform holders of uncertificated shares to what extent transfer of the shares will be restricted after the payment demand is received;

supply a form for demanding payment that includes the date of the first announcement to news media or to shareholders of the terms of the proposed corporate action and requires that the person asserting dissenters’ rights certify whether or not the person acquired beneficial ownership of the shares before that date;

set a date by which the corporation must receive the payment demand, which date may not be fewer than 30 nor more than 60 days after the date the subsection (a) notice is delivered; and

be accompanied by a copy of this chapter.

HISTORY:

Added

1993, No. 85

, § 2, eff. Jan. 1, 1994.

§ 13.23.
Duty to demand payment.

A shareholder sent a dissenters’ notice described in section 13.22 of this title must demand payment, certify whether he or she acquired beneficial ownership of the shares before the date required to be set forth in the dissenters’ notice pursuant to subdivision 13.22(b)(3) of this title, and deposit his or her certificates in accordance with the terms of the notice.

The shareholder who demands payment and deposits his or her share certificates under subsection (a) of this section retains all other rights of a shareholder until these rights are cancelled or modified by the taking of the proposed corporate action.

A shareholder who does not demand payment or deposit his or her share certificates where required, each by the date set in the dissenters’ notice, is not entitled to payment for his or her shares under this chapter.

HISTORY:

Added

1993, No. 85

, § 2, eff. Jan. 1, 1994.

§ 13.24.
Share restrictions.

The corporation may restrict the transfer of uncertificated shares from the date the demand for their payment is received until the proposed corporate action is taken or the restrictions released under section 13.26 of this title.

The person for whom dissenters’ rights are asserted as to uncertificated shares retains all other rights of a shareholder until these rights are cancelled or modified by the taking of the proposed corporate action.

HISTORY:

Added

1993, No. 85

, § 2, eff. Jan. 1, 1994.

§ 13.25.
Payment.

Except as provided in section 13.27 of this title, as soon as the proposed corporate action is taken, or upon receipt of a payment demand, the corporation shall pay each dissenter who complied with section 13.23 of this title the amount the corporation estimates to be the fair value of his or her shares, plus accrued interest.

The payment must be accompanied by:

the corporation’s balance sheet as of the end of a fiscal year ending not more than 16 months before the date of payment, an income statement for that year, a statement of changes in shareholders’ equity for that year, and the latest available interim financial statements, if any;

a statement of the corporation’s estimate of the fair value of the shares and how such estimate was calculated;

an explanation of how the interest was calculated;

a statement of the dissenter’s right to demand payment under section 13.28 of this title; and

a copy of this chapter.

HISTORY:

Added

1993, No. 85

, § 2, eff. Jan. 1, 1994.

§ 13.26.
Failure to take action.

If the corporation does not take the proposed action within 60 days after the date set for demanding payment and depositing share certificates, the corporation shall return the deposited certificates and release the transfer restrictions imposed on uncertificated shares.

If after returning deposited certificates and releasing transfer restrictions, the corporation takes the proposed action, it must send a new dissenters’ notice under section 13.22 of this title and repeat the payment demand procedure.

HISTORY:

Added

1993, No. 85

, § 2, eff. Jan. 1, 1994.

§ 13.27.
After-acquired shares.

A corporation may elect to withhold payment required by section 13.25 of this title from a dissenter unless the dissenter was the beneficial owner of the shares before the date set forth in the dissenters’ notice as the date of the first announcement to news media or to shareholders of the terms of the proposed corporate action.

To the extent the corporation elects to withhold payment under subsection (a) of this section, after taking the proposed corporate action, it shall estimate the fair value of the shares, plus accrued interest, and shall pay this amount to each dissenter who agrees to accept it in full satisfaction of his or her demand. The corporation shall send with its offer a statement of its estimate and calculation of the fair value of the shares, an explanation of how the interest was calculated, and a statement of the dissenter’s right to demand payment under section 13.28 of this title.

HISTORY:

Added

1993, No. 85

, § 2, eff. Jan. 1, 1994.

§ 13.28.
Procedure if shareholder dissatisfied with payment or offer.

A dissenter may notify the corporation in writing of his or her own estimate of the fair value of his or her shares and amount of interest due, and demand payment of his or her estimate (less any payment under section 13.25 of this title), or reject the corporation’s offer under section 13.27 of this title and demand payment of the fair value of his or her shares and interest due, if:

the dissenter believes that the amount paid under section 13.25 or offered under section 13.27 is less than the fair value of his or her shares or that the interest due is incorrectly calculated;

the corporation fails to make payment under section 13.25 within 60 days after the date set for demanding payment; or

the corporation, having failed to take the proposed action, does not return the deposited certificates or release the transfer restrictions imposed on uncertificated shares within 60 days after the date set for demanding payment.

A dissenter waives his or her right to demand payment under this section unless he or she notifies the corporation of his or her demand in writing under subsection (a) of this section within 30 days after the corporation made or offered payment for his or her shares.

HISTORY:

Added

1993, No. 85

, § 2, eff. Jan. 1, 1994.